Utah statutes.
59-1-1503.   Nonrefundable credit -- Sales and use tax exemption -- Sales and use tax remittance.

(1)  A nonrefundable individual income tax credit is allowed as provided in Section 59-10-1028 related to a capital gain on a transaction involving the exchange of one form of legal tender for another form of legal tender.

(2)  Sales of currency or coin are exempt from sales and use taxes as provided in Subsection 59-12-104(50).

(3)  The remittance of a sales and use tax on a transaction involving specie legal tender is as provided in Section 59-12-107.

